Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 15

Mutual Savings and Loan Holding Company Act

45-3-1501. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Mutual Savings and Loan Holding Company Act.”

Acts 1989, ch. 354, § 1.

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

45-3-1502. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of financial institutions;

“Principal place of business” of a mutual savings and loan holding company means the state in which the total deposits of all offices of all subsidiaries are the largest as shown by the most recent reports of condition filed with state or federal regulatory authorities;

“Savings and loan mutual holding company” means any company that, directly or indirectly, or acting in concert with one (1) or more other persons or through one (1) or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, or holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the voting shares or rights of any association or savings bank or savings and loan holding company or controls in any manner, whether by holding of proxies or otherwise, the election of a majority of the directors of the institution. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no holding company shall be deemed to have control of or over a savings institution or holding company:

By virtue of its ownership or control of shares in a fiduciary capacity arising in the ordinary course of its business;

By virtue of its ownership or control of shares acquired by it in connection with its underwriting of securities that are held only for a period of time that will permit the sale of the shares upon a reasonable basis;

By virtue of its holding any shares as collateral taken in the ordinary course of securing a debt or other obligation;

By virtue of its ownership or control of shares acquired in the ordinary course of collecting a debt or other obligation previously contracted in good faith, until five (5) years after the date acquired; or

By virtue of its voting rights with respect to shares of any savings institution or holding company acquired in the course of a proxy solicitation in the case of a company formed and operated for the sole purpose of participating in a proxy solicitation;

“Subsidiary,” whether of an individual or a company, means any company that is controlled by the person or by a company that is a subsidiary of the person by virtue of this part; and

“Tennessee mutual holding company” means a savings and loan holding company whose principal place of business is in Tennessee and that is not controlled, directly or indirectly, by another savings and loan holding company whose principal place of business is outside Tennessee.

Acts 1989, ch. 354, § 2.

45-3-1503. Savings and loan holding companies and their subsidiaries — Registration requirements.

Each savings and loan holding company and each subsidiary of the holding company shall register with the commissioner within one hundred eighty (180) days after July 3, 1989, or within ninety (90) days after becoming a mutual savings and loan holding company, whichever is later. Each mutual savings and loan holding company and each subsidiary of the holding company shall register on forms prescribed by the commissioner, which shall include information with respect to the financial condition, ownership, management, and inter-company relations of the mutual holding company and its subsidiaries and related matters that the commissioner deems necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this part.

Acts 1989, ch. 354, § 3.

45-3-1504. Mutual savings and loan holding companies and their subsidiaries — Reports — Examination — Fees.

With respect to each mutual savings and loan holding company and each subsidiary of the holding company, the following shall apply:

Each mutual savings and loan holding company and each subsidiary of the holding company shall file with the commissioner reports required by the commissioner. The reports shall be in the form that the commissioner prescribes. Each report shall contain information concerning the operations of each mutual savings and loan holding company and subsidiary that the commissioner may require;

Each mutual savings and loan holding company shall maintain books and records prescribed by the commissioner;

Each mutual savings and loan holding company and each subsidiary of the holding company shall be subject to examination that the commissioner prescribes;

Each mutual savings and loan holding company under this part may engage in activities that the commissioner by regulation may establish not inconsistent with any applicable federal law;

Each mutual savings and loan holding company operating under this part shall pay and be assessed by the commissioner fees and charges as may be necessary to cover the cost of its examination and supervision under this part; and

The commissioner is empowered to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, for the purpose of establishing fees to support the registration, examination, and supervision of companies under this part, including fees for the costs of application and issuance of a charter.

Acts 1989, ch. 354, § 4.

45-3-1505. Acquisitions — Application — Approval required.

A mutual savings and loan holding company may acquire control of a subsidiary, association, or mutual savings and loan holding company upon application to and the prior written approval of the commissioner. The application shall be in the form prescribed by the commissioner and shall contain information that enables the commissioner to determine if the acquisition is consistent with the public interest of maintaining a sound financial system.

Acts 1989, ch. 354, § 5.

45-3-1506. Ownership limitations — Statutory compliance.

No mutual savings and loan holding company other than a Tennessee mutual savings and loan holding company may control or own more than five percent (5%) of the voting shares or rights of any Tennessee association or Tennessee savings and loan holding company unless the mutual savings and loan holding company meets the requirements of a southern region savings and loan holding company as defined in §45-3-1402. Any acquisition of a Tennessee association (mutual or stock) or Tennessee savings and loan mutual holding company shall be governed by and meet the requirements of part 14 of this chapter.

Acts 1989, ch. 354, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Section 45-3-1402(9), referred to in this section, no longer defines a “southern region savings and loan holding company.” Section 45-3-1402(9) was rewritten by Acts 1990, ch. 650, § 2; it now refers to an “out-of-state savings and loan holding company”.

45-3-1507. Appointment of personnel — Bonding requirements.

The commissioner shall appoint, subject to any applicable provisions of law, a supervisor, such examiners, employees, experts and special assistants as may be necessary to effectively carry out this part. The commissioner shall require each supervisor, examiner, expert, and special assistant employed or appointed by the commissioner to give bond, with security to be approved by the commissioner, in an amount set by the commissioner, conditioned for the faithful discharge of the person's duties. Premium on the bond shall be paid by the commissioner from funds appropriated for that purpose. The bond, together with verification of payment of the premium on the bond, shall be on file in the office of the commissioner and subject to public inspection.

Acts 1989, ch. 354, § 7.

45-3-1508. Commissioner — Duties and powers.

The commissioner has the duty and power to:

Exercise the rights, powers and duties set forth in this part or in any other related or applicable act;

Promulgate, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, regulations that are reasonable or necessary to accomplish the purposes of this part;

Direct and supervise the administrative and technical activities incident to mutual savings and loan holding companies and to create if, in the exercise of discretion, the commissioner deems the creation desirable, an advisory committee that upon request will make recommendations to the commissioner;

Make an annual report with respect to mutual savings and loan holding companies and their operation under this part that the commissioner deems desirable, or that the governor requests;

Cause suit to be filed in the commissioner's name to enforce any law of this state that applies to an association, subsidiary of an association, or mutual holding company operating under this part;

Prescribe a uniform manner in which the books and records of every mutual holding company is to be maintained;

Establish reasonable and rationally based fee structures for each mutual holding company operating under this part; and

Approve an application for a charter, if the commissioner affirmatively finds from all the information furnished with the application and any official records that there has been compliance with the prerequisites of this part. The commissioner, if so finding, shall state the approval and findings in writing.

Acts 1989, ch. 354, § 7.